Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-921
Suit against employee; act or omission occurring prior to May 13, 1987; limitation of action.

After January 1, 1988, all suits against any employee of a political subdivision for money on account of damage to or loss of property or personal injury to or the death of any person caused by any negligent or wrongful act or omission of the employee while acting within the scope of his or her office or employment and occurring prior to May 13, 1987, shall be forever barred unless the party seeking recovery had, within one year after such claim accrued, submitted a claim in writing to the governing body of the political subdivision in accordance with section 13-905.

Laws 1987, LB 258, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1987, § 23-2416.02.

A negligence cause of action arising from acts of an employee of a political subdivision which occurred prior to May 13, 1987, is controlled by this section, for which no explicit statute of limitations is provided. Gatewood v. Powell, 1 Neb. App. 749, 511 N.W.2d 159 (1993).